Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
CHAPTER 22 Georgia Defined Contribution Plan

47-22-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Accumulated contributions” means the sum of all amounts deducted from the compensation of a member’s salary and credited to such member’s individual account in this plan, together with earnings thereon as provided in this chapter.

“Board” means the Board of Trustees of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia.

“Defined contribution plan” means a plan which provides for an individual account for each participant and for benefits based solely on the amount contributed to the participant’s account; any income, expenses, gains, and losses; and any forfeiture of accounts of other participants which may be allocated to such participant’s account, which plan is intended to be qualified under Section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, 42 U.S.C. Section 401(a).

“Employee” means any employee of an employer who is not a member of any public retirement or pension system created pursuant to this title; provided, however, the following persons shall not be considered employees under this paragraph:

A person performing services for an institution in which such person is duly enrolled as a full-time student;

A person performing services for an employer pursuant to a contract as a bona fide independent contractor; or

Members of any state board or commission.

“Employer” means the state or any department, bureau, institution, board, or commission of the state, the State Board of Education, and the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia.

“Member” means any employee included in the membership of the plan.

“Plan” means the Georgia Defined Contribution Plan created by this chapter.

“Plan year” means the 12 month period beginning July 1 of each year.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-22-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1288, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1302, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 947, § 29/HB 202.

The 2009 amendment,

effective May 11, 2009, added paragraph (8).

47-22-2.
Creation of Georgia Defined Contribution Plan.

There is created and placed under the administration of the Board of Trustees of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia the Georgia Defined Contribution Plan.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-22-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1288, § 1.

47-22-3.
Executive secretary.

There is created an office known as the executive secretary of the Georgia Defined Contribution Plan, and the director of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia shall serve as the executive secretary of the plan.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-22-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1288, § 1.

47-22-4.
Administration and operation of plan; records; payment of employees and expenses; investment.

The general administration and responsibility for the proper operation of the plan and for putting this chapter into effect are vested in the board.

The board shall keep a record of all of its proceedings under this chapter, which record shall be open to the public.

All persons employed by the board and the expenses of the board in furtherance of this chapter shall be paid from funds appropriated to the plan until such time as the board determines that the return on investments is sufficient to cover such costs.

The board may combine the moneys subject to this chapter with other moneys under the control of the board for purposes of investment, provided that a separate accounting is maintained for all moneys subject to this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-22-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1288, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 535, § 28/HB 460; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 59/SB 436.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, deleted former subsections (b) through (d), which read: “(b) The board shall engage such actuarial and other services as shall be required to transact the business of the plan.

“(c) The board shall designate an actuary who shall be the technical adviser of the board on matters regarding the operation of the plan and shall perform such other duties as are required in connection therewith.

“(d) Subject to the limitations of this chapter, the board shall, from time to time, adopt the plan document and establish rules and regulations for the administration of the plan and for the transaction of business.”; and redesignated former subsections (e) through (g) as present subsections (b) through (d), respectively.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-22-5.
Trustee of funds of plan; power to invest funds; conflicts of interest as to investments; custody of funds; vouchers.

The board shall be the trustee of the funds of the plan; may invest and reinvest such funds; and may hold, purchase, sell, assign, transfer, and dispose of any of the securities and investments in which any of the funds created under this chapter shall have been invested, as well as the proceeds of such investments and any moneys belonging to such fund, all in such manner as funds of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia are invested and reinvested.

Except as otherwise provided for in this chapter, no member or person employed by the board shall have a direct interest in the gains or profits of any investment made by the board. No member or employee of the board shall, directly or indirectly, for himself or as an agent, in any manner use the funds of the plan except to make such current and necessary payments as are authorized by the board; nor shall any member or employee of the board become an endorser, surety, or in any manner an obligor for moneys loaned or borrowed from the board.

The board shall be the custodian of the funds of the plan. All payments from such funds shall be made by the board only upon vouchers signed by two persons designated by the board.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-22-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1288, § 1.

47-22-6.
Legal adviser.

The Attorney General shall be the legal adviser of the board.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-22-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1288, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 65/SB 436.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “adviser” for “advisor” near the end.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-22-7.
Membership in plan.

Any person who is an employee on July 1, 1992, shall become a member of the plan on such date.
Any person who becomes an employee after July 1, 1992, shall become a member on the date such person becomes an employee.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-22-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1288, § 1.

47-22-8.
Member contributions; earnings.

Each member shall contribute 7 1/2 percent of such member’s gross salary. Such contributions shall be made through payroll deductions. Such amount so deducted shall be credited to the individual account of the member.
Earnings shall be credited to each member’s account pursuant to rules and regulations adopted by the board as prescribed by the plan document.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-22-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1288, § 1.

47-22-9.
Payment of lump sum on termination of employment; continued accrual of earnings absent request for lump sum payment; withdrawal of moneys and closing of account upon cessation of employment; vesting and nonforfeitablility.

Upon the written request of a member who ceases to be an employee, a lump sum amount shall be paid to such person equal to the total amount credited to such member’s account at the time the member ceases to be an employee. If no such request is made, the member’s account shall continue to accrue earnings in the same manner as any member’s account.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section, if any member who ceases to be an employee has less than such minimum amount as determined by the board, but not more than $5,000.00, credited to such member’s account, the board may, at its option, require such member to withdraw all such moneys and the member’s account shall be closed; provided, however, that the board’s option to require withdrawal of small account balances shall be applied in a consistent manner; provided, further, that if the board provides for mandatory distributions of account balances greater than $1,000.00 and if a member does not elect to have such distribution paid directly to an eligible retirement plan specified by the member in a direct rollover or to receive the distribution directly, the plan shall pay the distribution in a direct rollover to an individual retirement plan designated by the board in accordance with Section 401(a)(31)(B) of the federal Internal Revenue Code.

Except as otherwise provided in Article 2 of Chapter 1 of this title, a member’s account balance in the plan shall at all times be 100 percent vested and nonforfeitable.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-22-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1288, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 1010, § 3/HB 1020; Ga. L. 2009, p. 947, § 30/HB 202; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 60/SB 436.

The 2009 amendment,

effective May 11, 2009, rewrote this Code section.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, deleted the former second sentence of subsection (a) which read: “If such member dies before payment has been made, such payment shall be made to such person as the member has nominated, by written designation filed with the board; otherwise to the member’s estate.”

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-22-10.
Lump sum payment on death of member.

Upon the death of any member, a lump sum amount shall be paid to such person as the member has nominated by written designation, filed with the board; otherwise to the member’s estate.
Such lump sum amount shall be equal to the total amount credited to the member’s account on the date of the member’s death.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-22-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1288, § 1.

47-22-11.
Retirement; option to receive periodic payment.

Any member shall be entitled to retire upon attaining the age of 65. Such member shall have the option to receive a periodic payment as permitted by the board.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-22-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1288, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 535, § 29/HB 460.